apertium-id-ms.ms.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="ISO-8859-1"?>

<dictionary> 
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHILMNOPRSTUWYJKVXZabcdefghilmnoprstuwyjkvxz</alphabet>

  <!-- Symbol definitions -->
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-id-ms.symbols.xml"/>

  <!-- Paradigm definitions -->
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Pronouns -->

    <!-- Prepositions -->
    <pardef n="ke__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <!-- Adjectives -->
    <pardef n="lanjut__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->
    <pardef n="butang__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    <!-- Verbs -->
    <pardef n="tekan__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->
    <pardef n="sila__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

  <!-- Main dictionary section -->
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="butang"><i>butang</i><par n="butang__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stage"><i>stage</i><par n="butang__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kamus"><i>kamus</i><par n="butang__n"/></e>
    <e lm="basikal"><i>basikal</i><par n="butang__n"/></e>

    <e lm="ke"><i>ke</i><par n="ke__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="guna"><i>guna</i><par n="ke__pr"/></e>

    <e lm="lanjut"><i>lanjut</i><par n="lanjut__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ke depan"><i>ke<b/>depan</i><par n="lanjut__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sila"><i>sila</i><par n="sila__adv"/></e>

    <e lm="tekan"><i>tekan</i><par n="tekan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="masuk"><i>masuk</i><par n="tekan__vblex"/></e>
  </section>

</dictionary>
